Florida, session 2026, SB324.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (5) of section 12 163.3180, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 163.3180âConcurrency.â 14 (5) 15 (d)âThe premise of concurrency is that the public 16 facilities will be provided in order to achieve and maintain the 17 adopted level of service standard. A comprehensive plan that 18 imposes transportation concurrency shall contain appropriate 19 amendments to the capital improvements element of the 20 comprehensive plan, consistent with the requirements of s. 21 163.3177(3). The capital improvements element shall identify 22 facilities necessary to meet adopted levels of service during a 23 5-year period or to maintain current levels of service for small 24 counties as defined in s. 339.2818(2). 25 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.